Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-841
Authority; bonds; issuance; form; proceeds; how used; replacement;
liability; liability insurance; indemnification.

The
authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution, at one time or from
time to time, for the issuance of bonds for the purpose of (1) paying, refinancing,
or reimbursing all or any part of the cost of a project, (2) administering
and operating the Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan Program and the
Nebraska Student Loan Assistance Program, or (3) making loans to any eligible institution in anticipation of the receipt
of tuition or other revenue by
the eligible institution.
Except to the extent payable from payments to be made on securities or federally
guaranteed securities as provided in sections 58-844 and 58-845, the principal of and the
interest on such bonds shall be payable solely out of the revenue of the authority
derived from the project or program to which they relate and from any other
facilities or assets pledged or made available therefor by the eligible institution for whose benefit such bonds
were issued. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at
such rate or rates, including
variations of such rates, without regard to any limit contained
in any other statute or law of the State of Nebraska, shall mature at such
time or times not exceeding forty years from the date thereof, all as may
be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity,
at the option of the authority, at such price or prices, which may be at a premium or discount, and
under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the authorizing
resolution and any trust indenture.
Except to the extent required by the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority
Act and for bonds issued to fund the Nebraska Student Loan Assistance Program,
such bonds are to be paid out of the revenue of the project to which they
relate and, in certain instances, the revenue of certain other facilities,
and subject to the provisions of sections 58-844
and 58-845 with respect to a pledge of securities or government
securities, the bonds may be unsecured or secured in the manner and to the
extent determined by the authority in its discretion.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including
any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination
or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal
and interest which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the
state. The bonds shall be signed in the name of the authority, by its chairperson
or vice-chairperson or by a facsimile signature of such person, the official
seal of the authority or a facsimile thereof shall be affixed thereto or printed or impressed thereon and
attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the executive director or
assistant executive director of the authority, except that facsimile signatures of members of the authority
shall be sufficient only if the resolution or trust indenture requires that
the trustee for such bond issue manually authenticate each bond and the resolution
or trust indenture permits the use of facsimile signatures, and
any coupons attached to the bonds shall bear the
facsimile signature of the executive director or assistant executive director
of the authority. The resolution
or trust indenture authorizing the bonds may provide that the bonds contain
a recital that they are issued under the Nebraska Educational, Health, and
Social Services Finance Authority Act, and such recital shall be deemed conclusive
evidence of the validity of the bonds and the regularity of the issuance.
The provisions of section 10-126 shall not apply to bonds issued by the authority.
The provisions of section 10-140 shall apply to bonds issued by the authority. In
case any official of the authority whose signature or a facsimile of whose
signature appears on any bonds or coupons ceases to be such an official before
the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless
be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he or she had remained
an official of the authority until such delivery.

All bonds issued under the act shall have and are hereby
declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments
under the law of the State of Nebraska. The bonds may be issued in coupon
or in registered form, or both, and one form may be exchangeable for the other
in such manner as the authority may determine. Provision may be made for the
registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both
principal and interest and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds
registered as to both principal and interest. The bonds may be sold in such
manner, either at public or private sale, as the authority may determine.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely
for the payment of the costs of the project or program for which such bonds
have been issued and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions,
if any, as the authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance
of such bonds or in the trust indenture provided for in
section 58-843 securing the same.
If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise,
are less than such costs, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to
provide the amount of such deficit and, unless otherwise provided in the resolution
authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust indenture securing
the same, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to
payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first
issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue exceed the cost of the project
or program for which they were issued, the surplus shall be deposited to the
credit of the sinking fund for such bonds or
shall be applied as may otherwise be permitted by applicable federal income
tax laws relating to the tax exemption of interest.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority
may under like restrictions issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with
or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds have
been executed and are available for delivery.

The authority may also provide for the replacement of any
bonds which become mutilated or are destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued
under the act without obtaining the consent of any officer, department, division,
commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state and without any other proceedings
or conditions other than those proceedings and conditions which are specifically
required by the act. The authority may out of any funds available therefor
purchase its bonds. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell such
bonds, subject to and in accordance with any agreement with the bondholders.

Members of the authority shall not be liable to the state,
the authority, or any other person as a result of their activities, whether
ministerial or discretionary, as authority members, except for willful dishonesty
or intentional violations of law. Members of the authority and any person
executing bonds or policies of insurance shall not be liable personally thereon
or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the
issuance thereof. The authority may purchase liability insurance for members,
officers, and employees and may indemnify any authority member to the same
extent that a school district may indemnify a school board member pursuant
to section 79-516.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 38;

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2938;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 38;

Laws 2003, LB 107, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB424, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2012, § 85-1738;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 41.